Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Great War Commission [Terminated]

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-405 provided that: “The commission [§§4-11-101 to4-11-105] shall cease to exist on November 11, 2018, at which time all the commission's minutes, files, papers, recordings, publications, and any other items of historical value shall be delivered to the state library and archives to ensure the preservation of such items.”